Massachusetts, session 194th, H3742.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1A of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- The registrar shall make a person’s
driving records available online for informational purposes. Such records shall be considered
unattested and need not be certified with the signature of the registrar, but shall include any
suspensions, outstanding tickets or other citations issued to the driver. Such records shall be
updated regularly to reflect the most accurate information available, consistent with the way in
which attested driving records are maintained for law enforcement agencies.
of 1